Nebraska, session 109, LB929.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB929 LB929
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-912, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
68-912 (1) Pursuant to this section, the The department may
establish (a) premiums, copayments, and deductibles for goods and
services provided under the medical assistance program, (b) limits on the
amount, duration, and scope of goods and services that recipients may
receive under the medical assistance program subject to subsection (5) of
this section, and (c) requirements for recipients of medical assistance
as a necessary condition for the continued receipt of such assistance,
including, but not limited to, active participation in care coordination
and appropriate disease management programs and activities.
(2) In establishing and limiting coverage for services under the
medical assistance program, the department shall consider (a) the effect
of such coverage and limitations on recipients of medical assistance and
medical assistance expenditures, (b) the public policy in section 68-905,
(c) the experience and outcomes of other states, (d) the nature and scope
of benchmark or benchmark-equivalent health insurance coverage as
recognized under federal law, and (e) other relevant factors as
determined by the department.
(3) Coverage for mandatory and optional services and limitations on
covered services as established by the department prior to July 1, 2006,
shall remain in effect until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified
pursuant to law. Any proposed reduction or expansion of services or
limitation of covered services by the department under this section shall
be subject to the review requirements of section 68-909.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, proposed rules
and regulations under this section relating to the establishment of
premiums, copayments, or deductibles for eligible recipients or limits on
the amount, duration, or scope of covered services for eligible
recipients shall not become effective until the conclusion of the
earliest regular session of the Legislature in which there has been a
-2-

LB929 LB929
2026 2026
reasonable opportunity for legislative consideration of such rules and
regulations. This subsection does not apply to rules and regulations that
are (a) required by federal or state law, (b) related to a waiver in
which recipient participation is voluntary, or (c) proposed due to a loss
of federal matching funds relating to a particular covered service or
eligibility category. Legislative consideration includes, but is not
limited to, the introduction of a legislative bill, a legislative
resolution, or an amendment to pending legislation relating to such rules
and regulations.
(5) Any limitation on the amount, duration, or scope of goods and
services that recipients may receive under the medical assistance program
shall give full and deliberate consideration to the role of home health
services from private duty nurses in meeting the needs of a disabled
family member or disabled person.
(6) The department shall not require deductions, cost sharing,
including deductibles, co-insurance, or copayments, or similar charges
unless required by federal law.
(7) The department shall implement the deduction, cost sharing, or
similar charges required by 42 U.S.C. 1396o(k) no earlier than October 1,
2028, by:
(a) Setting the amount of the deduction, cost sharing, or similar
charges at the lowest amount permitted by federal law;
(b) Permitting managed care organizations under the medical
assistance program to pay the deduction, cost sharing, or similar charges
on behalf of medicaid enrollees as allowed under federal law; and
(c) Prohibiting providers from denying care, items, or services to
any enrollee if an enrollee does not pay a required deduction, cost
sharing, or similar charge.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-912, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is repealed.
-3-